Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,351
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to remove from street use and operation minibikes and similar two-wheeled, three-wheeled, or four-wheeled miniature vehicles, the visibility, power, and equipment of which are inadequate for mixing with normal vehicular traffic upon streets and highways. This section shall not apply to an electric personal assistive mobility device.

Laws 1971, LB 644, § 10;

Laws 1972, LB 1196, § 9;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 134;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 60-2105;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 447;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 465.